Utah statutes.
13-32a-109.5.   Seizure of property.

(1)  If a law enforcement agency determines seizure of pawned or sold property is necessary during the course of a criminal investigation in addition to the holding provisions under Section 13-32a-109, the law enforcement agency shall:

(a)  notify the pawnshop of the specific item to be seized;

(b)  issue to the pawnshop a seizure ticket in a form approved by the division and that:

(i)  provides the active case number related to the item to be seized;

(ii)  provides the date of the seizure request;

(iii)  describes the article to be seized; and

(iv)  includes any information that facilitates the pawnbroker's ability to track the article when the prosecution agency takes over the case.

(2)  If the law enforcement agency seizing the pawned or sold property is not the local law enforcement agency, the seizing agency shall, in addition to compliance with Subsection (1):

(a)  notify the local law enforcement agency prior to any seizure; and

(b)  facilitate the seizure of the pawned property in cooperation with the local law enforcement agency to provide the pawnshop or secondhand business the ability to monitor the proceedings under Section 13-32a-109.8.

